pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Arquivamento e organização > Suprimentos para encadernação: Acessórios para fichários; Fichários; Espirais para encadernação; Máquinas de encadernação
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Pohrana i organizacija > Pribor za uvez: Pribor za registratore; Veziva; Spirale za uvezivanje; Strojevi za uvezivanje
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 收納整理用品 > 裝訂用品: 裝訂配件; 資料孔夾; 裝訂線圈; 包紮機
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Zlaganje in urejanje dokumentov > Potrebščine za vezavo: Dodatki za mape; Mape; Letvice in špirale za vezavo; Stroji za vezavo
es: Material de oficina > Clasificación y organización > Materiales de encuadernación: Accesorios de encuadernación; Archivadores; Lomos y canutillos de encuadernación; Encuadernadoras
da: Kontorforsyning > Arkivering og organisering > Indbinding – tilbehør: Ringbind – tilbehør; Ringbind; Indbinding – kam eller spiralryg; Indbindingsmaskiner
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > การจัดเก็บเอกสารและการจัดระเบียบ > อุปกรณ์เข้าเล่ม: อุปกรณ์เย็บเล่ม; แฟ้มเอกสาร; สันกระดูกงูและสันห่วง; เครื่องเย็บเล่ม
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Картотека и организация > Консумативи за подвързване: Аксесоари за класьори; Класьори; Гребени и спирали за подвързване; Машини за подвързване
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Органайзеры и товары для хранения документов > Товары для брошюровки: Аксессуары для папок-регистраторов; Папки-регистраторы; Пружины для переплета; Брошюровщики
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Třídění a uspořádání dokumentů > Vázací potřeby: Vazačky – příslušenství; Vazačky; Vázací hřebeny a hřbety; Vazbovače
ja: オフィス用品 > ファイル・バインダー > バインダー・製本用品: バインダー関連用品; バインダー; 製本リング; 製本機
it: Forniture per ufficio > Archiviazione e organizzazione > Forniture per rilegature: Accessori rilegatura; Raccoglitori; Legature e dorsi per rilegatura; Rilegatrici
nb: Kontormateriell > Arkivering og organisering > Ringpermutstyr: Ringpermtilbehør; Ringpermer; Ringpermkammer og -rygger; Bokbindermaskiner
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Αρχειοθέτηση & οργάνωση > Προμήθειες βιβλιοδεσίας: Αξεσουάρ βιβλιοδεσίας; Ντοσιέ; Σπιράλ & ράχες βιβλίων βιβλιοδεσίας; Μηχανές βιβλιοδεσίας
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Classement et organisation > Matériel de reliure: Accessoires pour classeurs; Classeurs; Spirales et peignes pour reliures; Machines à relier
en: Office Supplies > Filing & Organization > Binding Supplies: Binder Accessories; Binders; Binding Combs & Spines; Binding Machines
de: Bürobedarf > Ablage & Organisation > Bindesysteme: Aktenordnerzubehör; Aktenordner; Binderücken; Bindegeräte
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Arkiv och organisering > Pärmmaterial: Pärmtillbehör; Pärmar; Spiraler och ryggar för inbindning; Inbindningsmaskiner
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kartotéka a organizácia > Viazacie potreby: Príslušenstvo k zakladačom; Zakladače; Viazacie hrebene a chrbáty; Viazacie stroje
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Kẹp tài liệu và ngăn chia tài liệu > Kẹp tài liệu: Phụ kiện bìa kẹp; Bìa còng nhẫn; Gáy xoắn và gáy sách; Máy đóng gáy
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Bylų saugojimas ir tvarkymas > Įrišimo reikmenys: Segtuvų priedai; Segtuvai; Įrišimo spiralės; Įrišimo mašinos
hu: Irodai kellékek > Tárolás és rendezés > Kötőkellékek: Kötőkiegészítők; Kötők; Kötőfésűk és -tüskék; Kötőgépek
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Sortowanie i utrzymanie porządku > Oprawa dokumentów: Akcesoria do segregatorów; Segregatory; Grzbiety do bindowania; Bindownice
ko: 사무용품 > 서류 정리 용품 > 바인더 용품: 바인더 부대용품; 바인더; 제본 링/스트립; 제본기
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Arquivo e organização > Acessórios de encadernação: Acessórios para capas de arquivo; Capas de arquivo; Combinações e espirais de união; Encadernadoras
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Arkistointi ja järjestys > Kansiotarvikkeet: Kansioiden lisätarvikkeet; Mapit; Sidontakammat ja -kierteet; Nidontakoneet
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Dosyalama ve Organizasyon > Ciltleme Malzemeleri: Ciltleme Aksesuarları; Ciltler; Spiral Ciltler; Ciltleme Makineleri
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Archiveren en indelen > Benodigdheden voor inbinden: Accessoires voor ringbanden; Ringbanden; Bindringen; Bindmachines
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 文件整理 > 装订用品: 活页夹配件; 活页夹/孔型夹; 装订梳/装订铁圈; 装订机
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Clasare și organizare > Materiale pentru legat: Accesorii pentru bibliorafturi; Bibliorafturi; Spirale și baze pentru legat; Mașini de legat